Hawaii statutes.
I.
Enforcement

[§11-401] Subpoena powers. (a)
The commission may subpoena witnesses, examine them under oath, and require the
production of books, papers, documents, or objects to the commission office or
at any place in the State whether or not the subpoena is in connection with any
hearing; provided that the person or documents subpoenaed shall be relevant to
a matter under study or investigation by the commission.

(b) The books, papers, documents, or objects
may be retained by the commission for a reasonable period of time for
examination, audit, copying, testing, and photographing.

(c) The subpoena power shall be exercised by
the chairperson of the commission, or the chairperson's designee.

(d) Upon application of the commission,
obedience to the subpoena shall be enforced by the circuit court in the county
in which the person subpoenaed resides or is found, in the same manner as a
subpoena issued by a circuit court. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next